Utah, session 2026, HB414.
Section 1. Section 58-69-102 is amended to read:58-69-102. Definitions.In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:(1)"Asynchronous technology" means store-and-forward technology that allows for the transmission of a patient's health information to a dentist for viewing at a later time.(2)"Board" means the Dentist and Dental Hygienist Licensing Board created in Section 58-69-201.(3)"Dental assistant" means an unlicensed individual who engages in supervised acts and duties as defined by division rule made in collaboration with the board.(4)"Dental hygienist" means an individual licensed under this chapter as a dental hygienist.(5)"Dentist" means an individual licensed under this chapter as a dentist.(6)"Direct supervision" means the supervising dentist is present and available for face-to-face communication with the person being supervised when and where professional services are being provided.(7)"Expanded function" means a procedure that is authorized under Section 58-69-808.(8)"General supervision" means that the supervising dentist is available for consultation regarding work the supervising dentist has authorized, without regard as to whether the supervising dentist is located on the same premises as the person being supervised.(9)"Indirect supervision" means that the supervising dentist is present within the facility in which the person being supervised is providing services and is available to provide immediate face-to-face communication with the person being supervised.(10)"Practice of dental hygiene" means, with respect to humans and subject to Section 58-69-801:(a)performing a preliminary clinical examination of human teeth and gums;(b)making preliminary instrumental examination of a patient's periodontium;(c)conducting a dental hygiene assessment;(d)formulating a dental hygiene treatment plan for a patient, and communicating those findings and treatment recommendations;(e)evaluating a patient's progress towards achieving the goals specified in the dental hygiene treatment plan;(f)modifying a dental hygiene treatment plan based on the ongoing reassessment and in collaboration with a dentist;(g)removing deposits, accumulations, calculus, and concretions from the surfaces of human teeth;(h)removing toxins and debris from subgingival surfaces;(i)providing:(i)delegated dental hygiene care in accordance with a dentist's treatment plan for a patient; or(ii)dental hygiene care in accordance with a dental hygiene treatment plan;(j)representing oneself by any title, degree, or in any other way as being a dental hygienist;(k)administering local anesthesia and nitrous oxide analgesia, only as allowed by division rule and the supervision requirements described in Section 58-69-801;(l)directing a dental assistant when the supervising dentist is not on the premises;(m)exposing and capturing dental radiographs;(n)making impressions or intraoral scans of teeth or jaws;(o)performing tasks delegated by a dentist in other practices of dental hygiene as defined by division rule; and(p)performing expanded functions in accordance with Section 58-69-808.(11)"Practice of dentistry" means the following, regarding humans:(a)to offer, undertake, or represent that a person will undertake by any means or method, including teledentistry, to:(i)examine, evaluate, diagnose, treat, operate, or prescribe therapy for any disease, pain, injury, deficiency, deformity, or any other condition of the human teeth, alveolar process, gums, jaws, or adjacent hard and soft tissues and structures in the maxillofacial region;(ii)take an appropriate history and physical consistent with the level of professional service to be provided and the available resources in the facility in which the service is to be provided;(iii)make impressions, intraoral scans, or registrations;(iv)supply artificial teeth as substitutes for natural teeth, including placing veneers;(v)remove deposits, accumulations, calculus, and concretions from the surfaces of teeth;(vi)correct or attempt to correct malposition of teeth; and(vii)prescribe, deliver, and provide follow-up care for oral appliance therapy, including as a treatment for sleep-disordered breathing and obstructive sleep apnea;(b)to administer anesthetics necessary or proper in the practice of dentistry, only as allowed by an anesthesia and analgesia permit obtained from the division;(c)to administer and prescribe drugs related to and appropriate in the practice of dentistry;(d)to supervise the practice of a:(i)dental hygienist in accordance with Section 58-69-801; or(ii)dental assistant as established by division rule made in collaboration with the board; or(e)to represent oneself by any title, degree, or in any other way that one is a dentist.(12)"Public health agency" means a local health department as defined in Section 26A-1-102 or the Department of Health and Human Services.(13)"Public health setting" means:(a)an individual's residence, if the individual is non-ambulatory;(b)a school, as part of a school-based program;(c)a nursing home;(d)an assisted living or long-term care facility;(e)a community health center;(f)a hospital;(f)(g)if a dental hygienist is employed by a public health agency, a location directed by the public health agency;(g)(h)a federally-qualified health center; or(h)(i)a mobile dental health program that employs a dentist who is licensed under this chapter.(14)"Supervising dentist" means a licensed dentist who has agreed to provide supervision of a dental hygienist or unlicensed individual in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.(15)"Synchronous technology" means two-way audiovisual technology that allows a licensed dental professional to see and communicate in real time with a patient who is located in a different physical location.(16)"Teledentistry" means the practice of dentistry using synchronous or asynchronous technology.(17)"Unlawful conduct" means the same as that term is defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-69-501.(18)"Unprofessional conduct" means the same as that term is defined in Sections 58-1-501 and 58-69-502 and as may be further defined by rule.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.